Texas, session 892, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  DEFINITION. In this Act, "department" means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas. SECTION 2.  STUDY ON EMERGENCY ALERT NOTIFICATION SYSTEMS. The department, in coordination with the Department of State Health Services, the Texas Division of Emergency Management, the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, and the Texas Department of Transportation, shall conduct a study on the efficacy of emergency alert notification systems in this state, including the alert notification systems established under Subchapters K-1, L, L-1, M, P, and Q, Chapter 411, Government Code, and any other alert notification systems operated by the Texas Division of Emergency Management. In conducting the study, the department shall: (1)  analyze the means by which emergency alerts are communicated to the public, including roadside dynamic message signs and phone alerts; (2)  analyze the appropriateness of the geographic regions to which emergency alerts are broadcast, including whether the size of those geographic regions should be increased or decreased; (3)  consider whether there are too many emergency alert notification systems in use and the extent to which members of the public have deactivated emergency alert notifications on their cell phones; and (4)  determine, as applicable, the percentage of instances in which the activation of an emergency alert notification system successfully resolved an emergency after the alert was issued and the time it took from the issuance of the alert to the successful resolution. SECTION 3.  REPORT AND LEGISLATIVE RECOMMENDATIONS.  Not later than September 1, 2026, the department shall prepare and submit a written report summarizing the results of the study to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and each standing committee of the legislature with jurisdiction over an emergency alert notification system. The report must include recommendations for legislation to address the findings of the study. SECTION 4.  EXPIRATION. This Act expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 5.  EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.